Illinois, session 104th, SB2669.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois African-American Family Commission 5Act is amended by changing Sections 5, 10, 15, 20, 25, and 30 6as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 3903/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the RISE 9Illinois African-American Family Commission Act.10(Source: P.A. 93-867, eff. 8-5-04.) 11    (20 ILCS 3903/5)12    Sec. 5. Legislative findings. It is the policy of this 13State to deliver on the promise of systemic equity by moving 14from episodic reform to permanent investment.15    Black communities and other historically disinvested 16populations in this State continue to experience stark 17disparities across health, education, employment, housing, and 18justice. These disparities are the product of deliberate 19policy choices, economic exclusion, and structural racism.20    In response, the Illinois Legislative Black Caucus enacted 21a historic legislative agenda in 2021, structured around 4 22pillars:  SB2669- 2 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1        (1) criminal justice and police reform;2        (2) education and workforce development;3        (3) economic access and opportunity; and4        (4) health care and human services.5    The State recognizes that meaningful progress requires 6long-term, coordinated, and transparent investment. The 7Commission on Reform and Investment for Systemic Equity (RISE 8Commission) is established as the permanent entity to lead 9this effort. 10It is the policy of this State to promote family preservation 11and to preserve and strengthen families.12    (a) Over 12 million people live in Illinois. 13African-Americans represent 15% of the population and 26% of 14the residents living in Cook County. Despite some progress 15over the last few decades, African-Americans in Illinois 16continue to lag behind other racial groups relative to 17indicators of well-being in education, employment, income, and 18health. According to the 2000 U.S. Census, just 26% of the 19African-American population over 25 years of age in Illinois 20completed their high school education; 6% held an associate's 21degree; less than 10% (9%) held a bachelor's degree; less than 225% (3%) held a master's degree; and less than one percent held 23either a professional (.8%) or doctoral (.4%) degree. 24    These levels of education attainment reflect more 25fundamental problems with retaining African-Americans in 26school. The Illinois State Board of Education reported that   SB2669- 3 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1for the 2001-2002 school year, 36,373, or 6%, of students 2enrolled in public high schools dropped out. Thirty-nine 3percent of these students were African-Americans; 38% were 4White; 21% were Hispanic; and 2% were classified as Other. 5    Although African-Americans make up 18% of the high school 6population, they are disproportionately represented in the 7number of students who are suspended and expelled. In the 82001-2002 school year, 29,068 students were suspended from 9school. Forty-seven percent were White, 37% were 10African-American, 14% were Hispanic, and 1% were classified as 11Other. In regards to expulsions Statewide, the total number of 12high school students expelled was 1,651. Forty-three percent 13were African-American, 41% were White, 14% were Hispanic, and 142% were classified as Other. Within Chicago public schools, 15448 students were expelled. Seventy-seven of these students 16were African-American; 27% were White; 14% were Hispanic; and 174% were classified as Other. The fact that African-Americans 18are more likely to be suspended or expelled from school also 19contributes to the high dropout rate among African-American 20high school students. 21    In addition to educational challenges, African-Americans 22face challenges in the areas of employment and income. In the 23year 2000, the unemployment rate for African-Americans age 16 24years or older was 15% compared to only 6% for the total 25Illinois population. Moreover, the median household income of 26African-Americans in Illinois was $31,699 compared to $46,590   SB2669- 4 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1for the total Illinois population, and the percentage of 2African-American families below the poverty level in Illinois 3was 26% in 1999 compared to 10.7% for the total Illinois 4population in that same year. 5    Indicators of child welfare and criminal justice reveal 6still more challenges that African-American families face in 7Illinois. In 2000, African-American children represented 18% 8of children 18 years of age and under, but comprised 73% of 9children in substitute care. African-Americans are also 10overrepresented in the criminal justice population. Of the 11total Illinois adult inmate population in the year 2000, 65% 12were African-American. During this same time period, 13African-American youth represented 58% of the juvenile inmate 14population in Illinois. 15    While the leading causes of death among African-Americans 16are the same as those for the general population in Illinois, 17African-Americans have a higher rate of death per 100,000 18residents. The rate of overall deaths per 100,000 residents 19among African-Americans in the year 2000 was 1,181; 847 for 20Whites; and 411 for those classified as Other. The rate of 21cancer-related deaths per 100,000 residents by racial or 22ethnic groups in 2000 was: 278 African-Americans; 206 Whites; 23and 110 of those classified as Other. The rate of 24diabetes-related deaths per 100,000 residents among 25African-Americans in 2000 was 41 compared to 23 for Whites and 2613 for those classified as Other. The rate of deaths per   SB2669- 5 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1100,000 residents by heart disease among African-Americans in 22000 was 352 compared to 257 for Whites and 120 for those 3classified as Other. The rate of deaths per 100,000 residents 4by stroke among African-Americans in 2000 was 75; 60 for 5Whites; and 35 for those classified as Other. 6    African-Americans had higher rates of smoking and obesity 7than other racial groups in Illinois in 2001. 8African-Americans accounted for more of the new 9adult/adolescent AIDS cases, cumulative adult/adolescent AIDS 10cases, and number of people living with AIDS than other racial 11groups in Illinois in the year 2002. Still, 23% of uninsured 12persons in Illinois are African-American. 13    (b) The Illinois African-American Family Commission 14continues to be an essential key to promoting the preservation 15and strengthening of families. As of January 1, 2015 (the 16effective date of Public Act 98-693), just under 13 million 17people live in Illinois. African-Americans represent 15% of 18the population and 25% of the residents living in Cook County. 19Despite some progress over the last few decades, 20African-Americans in Illinois continue to lag behind other 21racial groups relative to indicators of well-being in 22education, employment, income, and health. According to the 232010 federal decennial census: just 28% of the 24African-American population over 25 years of age in Illinois 25completed their high school education; 36% had some college or 26an associate's degree; less than 12% held a bachelor's degree;   SB2669- 6 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1less than 8% held either a graduate or professional degree.2    These levels of education attainment reflect more 3fundamental problems with retaining African-Americans in 4school. The State Board of Education reported that for the 52010-2011 school year, 18,210, or 2.77%, of students enrolled 6in public high schools dropped out. 39.3% of these students 7were African-Americans; 32.6% were White; 24.2% were Hispanic; 8and 2% were classified as Other.9    Although African-Americans make up 20% of the high school 10population, they are disproportionately represented in the 11number of students who are suspended and expelled. In the 122011-2012 school year, 29,928 students were suspended from 13school. 36% were White, 34% were African-American, 26% were 14Hispanic, and 4% were classified as Other. With regard to 15expulsions statewide, the total number of high school students 16expelled was 982. 37% were African-American, 41% were White, 1721% were Hispanic, and 2% were classified as Other. Within 18Chicago public schools, 294 students were expelled. 80% of 19these students were African-American; none were White; 17% 20were Hispanic; and 3% were classified as Other. The fact that 21African-Americans are more likely to be suspended or expelled 22from school also contributes to the high dropout rate among 23African-American high school students.24    In addition to educational challenges, African-Americans 25face challenges in the areas of employment and income. In the 26year 2010, the unemployment rate for African-Americans age 16   SB2669- 7 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1years or older was 16% compared to only 9% for the total 2Illinois population. Moreover, the median household income of 3African-Americans in Illinois was $34,874 compared to $60,433 4for the total Illinois population, and the percentage of 5African-American families below the poverty level in Illinois 6was 32% in 2012 compared to 15% for the total Illinois 7population in that same year.8    Indicators of child welfare and criminal justice reveal 9still more challenges that African-American families face in 10Illinois. In 2010, African-American children represented 14% 11of children 18 years of age and under, but comprised 56% of 12children in substitute care. African-Americans are also 13overrepresented in the criminal justice population. Of the 14total Illinois adult inmate population in the year 2012, 57% 15were African-American. During this same time period, 16African-American youth represented 66% of the juvenile inmate 17population in Illinois.18    While the leading causes of death among African-Americans 19are the same as those for the general population in Illinois, 20African-Americans have a higher rate of death per 100,000 21residents. The rate of overall deaths per 100,000 residents 22among African-Americans in the year 2010 was 898; 741 for 23Whites; and 458 for those classified as Other. The rate of 24cancer-related deaths per 100,000 residents by racial or 25ethnic groups in 2010 was 216 for African-Americans; 179 for 26Whites; and 124 for those classified as Other. The rate of   SB2669- 8 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1diabetes-related deaths per 100,000 residents among 2African-Americans in 2010 was 114 compared to 66 for Whites 3and 75 for those classified as Other. The rate of deaths per 4100,000 residents by heart disease among African-Americans in 52010 was 232 compared to 179 for Whites and 121 for those 6classified as Other. The rate of deaths per 100,000 residents 7by stroke among African-Americans in 2010 was 108; 73 for 8Whites; and 56 for those classified as Other.9    African-Americans had higher rates of smoking and obesity 10than other racial groups in Illinois in 2013. 11African-Americans accounted for more of the new 12adult/adolescent AIDS cases, cumulative adult/adolescent AIDS 13cases, and number of people living with AIDS than other racial 14groups in Illinois in the year 2013. Still, 24% of uninsured 15persons in Illinois are African-American. 16    (c) These huge disparities in education, employment, 17income, child welfare, criminal justice, and health 18demonstrate the tremendous challenges facing the 19African-American family in Illinois. These challenges are 20severe. There is a need for government, child and family 21advocates, and other key stakeholders to create and implement 22public policies to address the health and social crises facing 23African-American families. The development of given solutions 24clearly transcends any one State agency and requires a 25coordinated effort. The Illinois African-American Family 26Commission shall assist State agencies with this task.   SB2669- 9 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1    The African-American Family Commission was created in 2October 1994 by Executive Order to assist the Illinois 3Department of Children and Family Services in developing and 4implementing programs and public policies that affect the 5State's child welfare system. The Commission has a proven 6track record of bringing State agencies, community providers, 7and consumers together to address child welfare issues. The 8ability of the Commission to address the above-mentioned 9health issues, community factors, and the personal well-being 10of African-American families and children has been limited due 11to the Executive Order's focus on child welfare. It is 12apparent that broader issues of health, mental health, 13criminal justice, education, and economic development also 14directly affect the health and well-being of African-American 15families and children. Accordingly, the role of the Illinois 16African-American Family Commission is hereby expanded to 17encompass working relationships with every department, agency, 18and commission within State government if any of its 19activities impact African-American children and families. The 20focus of the Commission is hereby restructured and shall exist 21by legislative mandate to engage State agencies in its efforts 22to preserve and strengthen African-American families. 23(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 24    (20 ILCS 3903/10)25    Sec. 10. RISE Illinois African-American Family Commission   SB2669- 10 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1established. The Commission on Reform and Investment for 2Systemic Equity (RISE Commission) is hereby created as an 3independent commission housed for administrative purposes 4within the Department of Human Services or another agency as 5determined by the Governor.6    On the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 7General Assembly, the Illinois African-American Family 8Commission is dissolved. All functions, appropriations, and 9ongoing programs under its direction shall be transferred to 10the RISE Commission. 11The African-American Family Commission shall be renamed and 12established as the Illinois African-American Family 13Commission. 14(Source: P.A. 93-867, eff. 8-5-04.) 15    (20 ILCS 3903/15)16    Sec. 15. Mission and duties. Purpose and objectives. The 17mission of the RISE Commission is to serve as the State's lead 18entity for advancing projects, programs, and initiatives 19aligned with the Illinois Legislative Black Caucus pillars.20    The RISE Commission shall:21        (1) Oversee, track, and coordinate statewide 22    investment strategies aligned with the 4 pillars of public 23    safety, education and workforce, economic development, and 24    health care.25        (2) Administer grant programs and provide funding to   SB2669- 11 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1    community-based organizations, units of government, 2    educational institutions, and health care providers 3    focused on systemic equity.4        (3) Monitor and evaluate outcomes, ensuring that all 5    State-funded equity efforts maintain audit-ready 6    documentation and meet measurable goals.7        (4) Advise the Governor and the General Assembly on 8    best practices and gaps in equity investment.9        (5) Publish an annual equity investment report 10    disclosing outcomes, recipient lists, and geographic 11    distribution of funding.12        (6) Maintain a public data dashboard tracking progress 13    on equity outcomes and State agency compliance. 14The purpose of the Illinois African-American Family Commission 15is to advise the Governor and General Assembly, as well as work 16directly with State agencies, to improve and expand existing 17policies, services, programs, and opportunities for 18African-American families. The Illinois African-American 19Family Commission shall guide the efforts of and collaborate 20with State agencies, including: the Department on Aging, the 21Department of Children and Family Services, the Department of 22Commerce and Economic Opportunity, the Department of 23Corrections, the Department of Human Services, the Department 24of Healthcare and Family Services, the Department of Public 25Health, the Department of Transportation, the Department of 26Employment Security, and others. This shall be achieved   SB2669- 12 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1primarily by: 2        (1) monitoring and commenting on existing and proposed 3    legislation and programs designed to address the needs of 4    African-Americans in Illinois; 5        (2) assisting State agencies in developing programs, 6    services, public policies, and research strategies that 7    will expand and enhance the social and economic well-being 8    of African-American children and families; 9        (3) facilitating the participation of and 10    representation of African-Americans in the development, 11    implementation, and planning of policies, programs, and 12    services; and 13        (4) promoting research efforts to document the impact 14    of policies and programs on African-American families. 15    The work of the Illinois African-American Family 16Commission shall include the use of existing reports, research 17and planning efforts, procedures, and programs. 18(Source: P.A. 100-863, eff. 8-14-18.) 19    (20 ILCS 3903/20)20    Sec. 20. Appointment; terms; structure; Executive 21Director; staffing. 22    (a) The RISE Commission shall consist of the following 23members:24        (1) four members appointed by the Governor;25        (2) two members appointed by the Speaker of the House   SB2669- 13 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1    of Representatives;2        (3) two members appointed by the President of the 3    Senate;4        (4) one member appointed by the Chair of the Illinois 5    Legislative Black Caucus who is a member of the House of 6    Representatives;7        (5) one member appointed by the Chair of the Illinois 8    Legislative Black Caucus who is a member of the Senate; 9    and10        (6) one member appointed by the Governor with the 11    advice of the Illinois Legislative Black Caucus Chairs who 12    shall serve as the Chair of the RISE Commission.13    (b) Appointees shall have demonstrated expertise in one or 14more of the following fields:15        (1) public safety;16        (2) education;17        (3) workforce development;18        (4) economic development;19        (5) health policy; or20        (6) community investment.21    Appointments shall reflect geographic, racial, and gender 22diversity.23    (c) Members shall serve 3-year terms, staggered for 24continuity. Members shall serve without compensation but may 25be reimbursed for official expenses. 26    (d) The Governor, based on a list of candidates provided   SB2669- 14 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1by the Chairs of the Joint House and Senate Black Caucus, shall 2appoint an Executive Director to lead the RISE Commission, 3subject to confirmation by the Senate. The Executive Director 4shall have experience in public policy, fiscal management, and 5community advocacy.6    (e) The Executive Director of the RISE Commission may hire 7staff necessary for the RISE Commission to fulfill its 8responsibilities, including roles in:9        (1) Program oversight and compliance.10        (2) Data analysis and impact evaluation.11        (3) Strategic planning and stakeholder engagement. 12The Illinois African-American Family Commission shall be 13comprised of 15 members.14    For those seats on the Commission with terms that expire 15in 2015, and for subsequent appointments to those seats, the 16Governor, the President of the Senate, the Minority Leader of 17the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and 18the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives shall each 19appoint one member to the Commission.20    For those seats on the Commission with terms that expire 21in 2016, and for subsequent appointments to those seats, the 22Governor, the President of the Senate, the Minority Leader of 23the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and 24the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives shall each 25appoint one member to the Commission.26    For those seats on the Commission with terms that expire   SB2669- 15 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1in 2017, and for subsequent appointments to those seats, the 2Governor shall appoint 5 members to the Commission. 3    Each member shall have a working knowledge of human 4services, community development, and economic public policies 5in Illinois. The Governor shall appoint the chairperson or 6chairpersons.7    The members shall reflect regional representation to 8ensure that the needs of African-American families and 9children throughout the State of Illinois are met. The members 10shall be selected from a variety of disciplines. They shall be 11representative of a partnership and collaborative effort 12between public and private agencies, the business sector, and 13community-based human services organizations. 14    Members shall serve 3-year terms, except in the case of 15initial appointments. One-third of initially appointed 16members, as determined by lot, shall be appointed to 1-year 17terms; 1/3 shall be appointed to 2-year terms; and 1/3 shall be 18appointed to 3-year terms, so that the terms are staggered. 19Members will serve without compensation, but shall be 20reimbursed for Commission-related expenses. 21    The Department on Aging, the Department of Children and 22Family Services, the Department of Commerce and Economic 23Opportunity, the Department of Corrections, the Department of 24Human Services, the Department of Healthcare and Family 25Services, the Department of Public Health, the State Board of 26Education, the Board of Higher Education, the Illinois   SB2669- 16 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1Community College Board, the Department of Human Rights, the 2Capital Development Board, the Department of Labor, and the 3Department of Transportation shall each appoint a liaison to 4serve ex-officio on the Commission. The Office of the 5Governor, in cooperation with the State agencies appointing 6liaisons to the Commission under this Section, shall provide 7administrative support to the Commission. 8(Source: P.A. 98-693, eff. 1-1-15.) 9    (20 ILCS 3903/25)10    Sec. 25. Funding. The General Assembly shall appropriate 11at least $2,000,000 annually to support the operations and 12grantmaking functions of the RISE Commission. The RISE 13Commission may also receive and expend funds from federal and 14private sources. 15The African-American Family Commission may receive funding 16through appropriations available for its purposes made to the 17Department on Aging, the Department of Children and Family 18Services, the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, 19the Department of Corrections, the Department of Human 20Services, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, 21the Department of Public Health, the State Board of Education, 22the Board of Higher Education, the Illinois Community College 23Board, the Department of Human Rights, the Capital Development 24Board, the Department of Labor, and the Department of 25Transportation. The Commission may also receive and expend   SB2669- 17 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1funding from federal and private sources, including gifts, 2donations, and private grants. 3(Source: P.A. 98-693, eff. 1-1-15.) 4    (20 ILCS 3903/30)5    Sec. 30. Public transparency and reporting. Reporting. The 6RISE Commission shall:7        (1) Maintain a publicly accessible database of all 8    projects and grants funded under its purview.9        (2) Submit an annual report to the General Assembly 10    and the Governor on the allocation, use, and impact of 11    funds.12        (3) Conduct an equity audit every 2 years to evaluate 13    alignment with the Illinois Legislative Black Caucus 14    pillars.15        (4) Develop an annual community investment scorecard 16    rating agency performance. 17The Illinois African-American Family Commission shall annually 18report to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the 19Commission on Equity and Inclusion on the Commission's 20progress toward its goals and objectives. 21(Source: P.A. 101-657, eff. 1-1-22.) 22    (20 ILCS 3903/35 rep.)23    Section 10. The Illinois African-American Family 24Commission Act is amended by repealing Section 35.   SB2669- 18 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1    Section 15. The Violence Prevention Task Force Act is 2amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 3    (20 ILCS 4028/5)4    Sec. 5. Violence Prevention Task Force; members. 5    (a) There is created the Violence Prevention Task Force 6(hereinafter referred to as the Task Force) consisting of 6 7members appointed as follows:8        (1) one member of the Senate appointed by the 9    President of the Senate;10        (2) one member of the Senate appointed by the Minority 11    Leader of the Senate;12        (3) one member of the House of Representatives 13    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; 14        (4) one member of the House of Representatives 15    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 16    Representatives; and17        (5) 2 members appointed by the Governor, one of whom 18    shall be designated the chairperson by the Governor.19    (b) The members of the Task Force shall serve without 20compensation but shall be reimbursed for their reasonable and 21necessary expenses from funds appropriated for that purpose.22    (c) The Task Force may employ skilled experts with the 23approval of the chairperson, and shall receive the cooperation 24of those State agencies it deems appropriate to assist the   SB2669- 19 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1Task Force in carrying out its duties.2    (d) The RISE Illinois African-American Family Commission, 3the Illinois Department of Public Health, and the Illinois 4Latino Family Commission shall provide administrative and 5other support to the Task Force.6(Source: P.A. 98-194, eff. 8-7-13; 98-756, eff. 7-16-14.) 7    Section 20. The Commission on Children and Youth Act is 8amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 9    (20 ILCS 4075/15)10    Sec. 15. Commission members; appointments. The Commission 11shall be composed of the following members, to be appointed 12within 60 days after the effective date of this Act: 13    (a) Four members of the General Assembly: 2 members of the 14Illinois Senate, one member appointed by the President of the 15Senate and one member appointed by the Senate Minority Leader; 162 members of the Illinois House of Representatives, one member 17appointed by the Speaker of the House and one member appointed 18by the House Minority Leader.19    (b) A member of the Governor's leadership team appointed 20by the Governor, who shall serve as one of the co-chairs of the 21Commission. 22    (c) Up to 30 public members appointed by the Governor with 23demonstrated interest and expertise in children and youth 24across the major stages of child and adolescent development.   SB2669- 20 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1Public members shall include rural, suburban and urban 2entities; direct service providers; child advocates; human 3rights organizations; faith-based service providers; 4philanthropic organizations that invest in children and youth; 5at least 3 parents of children under the age of 16; and at 6least 3 young people between the ages of 16 and 24. A second 7co-chair of the Commission shall be elected from among the 8public members of the Commission by the public members. 9    (d) The following shall serve as ex-officio members of the 10Commission: the Director of Children and Family Services or 11his or her designee; the Director of Commerce and Economic 12Opportunity or his or her designee; the Director of 13Corrections or his or her designee; the Director of Employment 14Security or his or her designee; the Director of Healthcare 15and Family Services or his or her designee; the Secretary of 16Human Services or his or her designee; the Director of 17Juvenile Justice or his or her designee; the Director of 18Public Health or his or her designee; the State Superintendent 19of Education or his or her designee; the Commissioner of the 20Chicago Department of Children and Youth Services or his or 21her designee; the Executive Director of the Illinois Violence 22Prevention Authority or his or her designee; the Chair of the 23RISE Illinois African-American Family Commission or his or her 24designee; and the Chair of the Latino Family Commission or his 25or her designee. In addition, there shall be a representative 26of a local government entity coordinating services for   SB2669- 21 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1children and youth and a representative of the Illinois Early 2Learning Council, to be chosen by the chairs.3(Source: P.A. 95-781, eff. 8-5-08.) 4    Section 25. The Commission to Study Disproportionate 5Justice Impact Act is amended by changing Section 10 as 6follows: 7    (20 ILCS 4085/10)8    Sec. 10. Composition. The Commission shall be composed of 9the following members:10        (a) Two members of the Senate appointed by the Senate 11    President, one of whom the President shall designate to 12    serve as co-chair, and 2 two members of the Senate 13    appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.14        (b) Two members of the House of Representatives 15    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, 16    one of whom the Speaker shall designate to serve as 17    co-chair, and 2 two members of the House of 18    Representatives appointed by the Minority Leader of the 19    House of Representatives.20        (c) The following persons or their designees:21            (1) the Attorney General,22            (2) the Chief Judge of the Circuit Court of Cook 23        County,24            (3) the Director of the Illinois State Police,  SB2669- 22 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1            (4) the Superintendent of the Chicago Police 2        Department,3            (5) the sheriff of Cook County,4            (6) the State Appellate Defender,5            (7) the Cook County Public Defender,6            (8) the Director of the Office of the State's 7        Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor,8            (9) the Cook County State's Attorney,9            (10) the Executive Director of the Criminal 10        Justice Information Authority,11            (11) the Director of Corrections, 12            (12) the Director of Juvenile Justice, and13            (13) the Executive Director of the RISE Illinois 14        African-American Family Commission. 15        (d) The co-chairs may name up to 8 persons, 16    representing minority communities within Illinois, groups 17    involved in the improvement of the administration of 18    justice, behavioral health, criminal justice, law 19    enforcement, and the rehabilitation of former inmates, 20    community groups, and other interested parties. 21(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 22    Section 30. The Racial and Ethnic Impact Research Task 23Force Act is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 24    (20 ILCS 5025/10)  SB2669- 23 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1    Sec. 10. Racial and Ethnic Impact Research Task Force. 2There is created the Racial and Ethnic Impact Research Task 3Force, composed of the following members:4        (1) Two members of the Senate appointed by the Senate 5    President, one of whom the President shall designate to 6    serve as co-chair, and 2 members of the Senate appointed 7    by the Minority Leader of the Senate.8        (2) Two members of the House of Representatives 9    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, 10    one of whom the Speaker shall designate to serve as 11    co-chair, and 2 members of the House of Representatives 12    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 13    Representatives.14        (3) The following persons or their designees:15            (A) the Attorney General,16            (B) the Chief Judge of the Circuit Court of Cook 17        County,18            (C) the Director of the Illinois State Police,19            (D) the Superintendent of the Chicago Police 20        Department,21            (E) the Sheriff of Cook County,22            (F) the State Appellate Defender,23            (G) the Cook County Public Defender,24            (H) the Director of the Office of the State's 25        Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor,26            (I) the Cook County State's Attorney,  SB2669- 24 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1            (J) the Executive Director of the Illinois 2        Criminal Justice Information Authority,3            (K) the Director of Corrections,4            (L) the Director of Juvenile Justice, and5            (M) the Executive Director of the RISE Illinois 6        African-American Family Commission.7        (4) The co-chairs may name up to 8 persons, 8    representing minority communities within Illinois, groups 9    involved in the improvement of the administration of 10    justice, behavioral health, criminal justice, law 11    enforcement, and the rehabilitation of former inmates, 12    community groups, and other interested parties. 13(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 14    Section 35. The Commission on Equity and Inclusion Act is 15amended by changing Section 40-10 as follows: 16    (30 ILCS 574/40-10)17    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-961)18    Sec. 40-10. Powers and duties. In addition to the other 19powers and duties which may be prescribed in this Act or 20elsewhere, the Commission shall have the following powers and 21duties: 22        (1) The Commission shall have a role in all State and 23    university procurement by facilitating and streamlining 24    communications between the Business Enterprise Council for   SB2669- 25 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1    Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities, the 2    purchasing entities, the Chief Procurement Officers, and 3    others. 4        (2) The Commission may create a scoring evaluation for 5    State agency directors, public university presidents and 6    chancellors, and public community college presidents. The 7    scoring shall be based on the following 3 principles: (i) 8    increasing capacity; (ii) growing revenue; and (iii) 9    enhancing credentials. These principles should be the 10    foundation of the agency compliance plan required under 11    Section 6 of the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 12    Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act.13        (3) The Commission shall exercise the authority and 14    duties provided to it under Section 5-7 of the Illinois 15    Procurement Code. 16        (4) The Commission, working with State agencies, shall 17    provide support for diversity in State hiring. 18        (5) The Commission shall supervise the implementation 19    and effectiveness of supplier diversity training of the 20    State procurement workforce. 21        (6) Each January, and as otherwise frequently as may 22    be deemed necessary and appropriate by the Commission, the 23    Commission shall propose and submit to the Governor and 24    the General Assembly legislative changes to increase 25    inclusion and diversity in State government. 26        (7) The Commission shall have oversight over the   SB2669- 26 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1    following entities: 2            (A) (blank); the Illinois African-American Family 3        Commission; 4            (B) the Illinois Latino Family Commission; 5            (C) the Asian American Family Commission; 6            (D) the Illinois Muslim American Advisory Council; 7            (E) the Illinois African-American Fair Contracting 8        Commission created under Executive Order 2018-07; and 9            (F) the Business Enterprise Council for 10        Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities. 11        (8) The Commission shall adopt any rules necessary for 12    the implementation and administration of the requirements 13    of this Act. 14        (9) The Commission shall exercise the authority and 15    duties provided to it under Section 45-57 of the Illinois 16    Procurement Code. 17        (10) The Commission is responsible for completing 18    studies as required by Section 35-15 of the Illinois 19    Community Reinvestment Act. 20(Source: P.A. 102-29, eff. 6-25-21; 102-671, eff. 11-30-21; 21103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 103-959, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 22    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-961)23    Sec. 40-10. Powers and duties. In addition to the other 24powers and duties which may be prescribed in this Act or 25elsewhere, the Commission shall have the following powers and   SB2669- 27 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1duties: 2        (1) The Commission shall have a role in all State and 3    university procurement by facilitating and streamlining 4    communications between the Business Enterprise Council for 5    Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities, the 6    purchasing entities, the Chief Procurement Officers, and 7    others. 8        (2) The Commission may create a scoring evaluation for 9    State agency directors, public university presidents and 10    chancellors, and public community college presidents. The 11    scoring shall be based on the following 3 principles: (i) 12    increasing capacity; (ii) growing revenue; and (iii) 13    enhancing credentials. These principles should be the 14    foundation of the agency compliance plan required under 15    Section 6 of the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 16    Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act.17        (3) The Commission shall exercise the authority and 18    duties provided to it under Section 5-7 of the Illinois 19    Procurement Code. 20        (4) The Commission, working with State agencies, shall 21    provide support for diversity in State hiring. 22        (5) The Commission shall supervise the implementation 23    and effectiveness of supplier diversity training of the 24    State procurement workforce. 25        (6) Each January, and as otherwise frequently as may 26    be deemed necessary and appropriate by the Commission, the   SB2669- 28 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1    Commission shall propose and submit to the Governor and 2    the General Assembly legislative changes to increase 3    inclusion and diversity in State government. 4        (7) The Commission shall have oversight over the 5    following entities: 6            (A) (blank); the Illinois African-American Family 7        Commission; 8            (B) the Illinois Latino Family Commission; 9            (C) the Asian American Family Commission; 10            (D) the Illinois Muslim American Advisory Council; 11            (E) the Illinois African-American Fair Contracting 12        Commission created under Executive Order 2018-07; and 13            (F) the Business Enterprise Council for 14        Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities. 15        (7.5) The Commission shall have oversight over the 16    collection of supplier diversity reports by State agencies 17    to the extent that those agencies are required to collect 18    supplier diversity reports. This oversight shall include 19    publishing, on the Commission's website, a copy of each 20    such supplier diversity report submitted to a State agency 21    and may include conducting an annual hearing with each 22    State agency to discuss ongoing compliance with supplier 23    diversity reporting requirements. The Commission is not 24    responsible for ensuring compliance by the filers of 25    supplier diversity reports to their respective agencies. 26    The agencies subject to oversight by the Commission and   SB2669- 29 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1    the relevant voluntary supplier diversity reports include 2    the following:3            (A) the Health Facilities and Services Review 4        Board for hospitals; 5            (B) the Department of Commerce and Economic 6        Opportunity for tax credit recipients under the 7        Economic Development for a Growing Economy Tax Credit 8        Act; 9            (C) the Illinois Commerce Commission for utilities 10        and railroads; 11            (D) the Illinois Gaming Board for casinos; and 12            (E) the Illinois Racing Board for race tracks. 13        (7.6) The Commission may hold public workshops focused 14    on specific industries and reports to collaboratively 15    connect diverse enterprises with entities that manage 16    supplier diversity programs. These workshops may be 17    modeled after Illinois Commerce Commission hearings for 18    utilities and railroads that include a collaborative 19    discussion of filed supplier diversity reports. 20        (8) The Commission shall adopt any rules necessary for 21    the implementation and administration of the requirements 22    of this Act. 23        (9) The Commission shall exercise the authority and 24    duties provided to it under Section 45-57 of the Illinois 25    Procurement Code. 26        (10) The Commission is responsible for completing   SB2669- 30 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1    studies as required by Section 35-15 of the Illinois 2    Community Reinvestment Act. 3(Source: P.A. 102-29, eff. 6-25-21; 102-671, eff. 11-30-21; 4103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 103-959, eff. 1-1-25; 103-961, eff. 57-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 6    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 7changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 8that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 9represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 10not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 11made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 12Public Act. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.  SB2669- 31 -LRB104 13912 SPS 26794 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 3903/14    20 ILCS 3903/55    20 ILCS 3903/106    20 ILCS 3903/157    20 ILCS 3903/208    20 ILCS 3903/259    20 ILCS 3903/3010    20 ILCS 3903/35 rep.11    20 ILCS 4028/512    20 ILCS 4075/1513    20 ILCS 4085/1014    20 ILCS 5025/1015    30 ILCS 574/40-10